New York, session 2025-2026, S6236.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Clauses (A) and (B) of subparagraph (ii) of paragraph b of 2 subdivision 2 of section 211-d of the education law, clause (A) as 3 amended by chapter 86 of the laws of 2023 and clause (B) as amended by 4 chapter 556 of the laws of 2022, are amended to read as follows: 5 (A) In a city school district in a city having a population of one 6 million or more inhabitants such contract shall also include a plan, 7 which shall be developed in collaboration with the collective bargaining 8 units representing teachers and the principals beginning in September 9 two thousand twenty-two and signed off on by the chancellor and the 10 presidents of each bargaining unit, to reduce actual class sizes, begin- 11 ning September two thousand [twenty-three] thirty-one and to be achieved 12 by September two thousand [twenty-eight] thirty-six for all classes, 13 with the exception of physical education and performing groups, as 14 follows: (1) kindergarten-third grade to have no more than twenty 15 students per class; (2) fourth-eighth grade to have no more than twen- 16 ty-three students per class; and (3) high school to have no more than 17 twenty-five students per class. Physical education and performing groups 18 shall have no more than forty students per class at all levels. Each 19 year of the plan, an additional twenty percent of the classrooms in the 20 city school district, excluding special education classes, shall be in 21 compliance with the class size targets such that the city school 22 district is in full compliance by two thousand [twenty-eight] thirty-six 23 and all classes should maintain the target class size. The class size EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10276-01-5 S. 6236 2 1 reduction plan shall prioritize schools serving populations with higher 2 poverty levels. 3 (B) The class size reduction plan shall include any exemptions to the 4 class size targets. These exemptions shall be limited to: (1) space; (2) 5 over-enrolled students; (3) license area shortages; [and] (4) severe 6 economic distress; (5) gifted and talented schools and programs; (6) 7 screened admissions schools and programs; (7) portfolio and specialized 8 high schools; and (8) advanced placement classes. Through school lead- 9 ership teams at each respective school, parents shall be included in any 10 discussions and decisions regarding such class size exemptions. Any such 11 exemptions shall be approved by the chancellor and the presidents of the 12 collective bargaining units representing the teachers and the principals 13 as part of the class size reduction plan. Should the chancellor and the 14 presidents of the collective bargaining units representing the teachers 15 and the principals be unable to reach agreement on the exemptions after 16 thirty days, the issue shall be determined by an arbitrator. In addi- 17 tion, any exemption based on available space shall include a reference 18 to the capital budget to demonstrate that the budget is aligned with 19 resolving the exemption status. Exempted classes, for the years in which 20 they are exempt, and special education classes shall not count toward 21 the twenty percent target. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.